utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4195 Y 1
SFX 4195 0 карски .
SFX 1414 Y 1
SFX 1414 0 нчиња .
SFX 4529 Y 1
SFX 4529 0 куваш .
SFX 4528 Y 1
SFX 4528 0 кувај .
SFX 694 Y 1
SFX 694 0 кува .
SFX 4085 Y 1
SFX 4085 0 епи .
SFX 2026 Y 1
SFX 2026 0 рава .
SFX 1356 Y 1
SFX 1356 0 икот .
SFX 4023 Y 1
SFX 4023 0 рави .
SFX 1558 Y 1
SFX 1558 0 ора .
SFX 629 Y 1
SFX 629 0 ори .
SFX 990 Y 1
SFX 990 0 алка .
SFX 2101 Y 1
SFX 2101 0 алки .
SFX 4961 Y 1
SFX 4961 0 осат .
SFX 4286 Y 1
SFX 4286 0 ошен .
SFX 4580 Y 1
SFX 4580 0 пиев .
SFX 2016 Y 1
SFX 2016 0 атине .
SFX 3968 Y 1
SFX 3968 0 неење .
SFX 389 Y 1
SFX 389 0 ивме .
SFX 3111 Y 1
SFX 3111 0 тнава .
SFX 3243 Y 1
SFX 3243 0 сената .
SFX 896 Y 1
SFX 896 0 нувањево .
SFX 1695 Y 1
SFX 1695 0 арскиот .
SFX 1135 Y 1
SFX 1135 0 аја .
SFX 486 Y 1
SFX 486 0 ест .
SFX 3134 Y 1
SFX 3134 0 дноно .
SFX 2266 Y 1
SFX 2266 0 метарот .
SFX 1121 Y 1
SFX 1121 0 киов .
SFX 1126 Y 1
SFX 1126 0 кион .
SFX 4089 Y 1
SFX 4089 0 гав .
SFX 3835 Y 1
SFX 3835 0 гал .
SFX 2650 Y 1
SFX 2650 0 ган .
SFX 628 Y 1
SFX 628 0 рија .
SFX 1370 Y 1
SFX 1370 0 лница .
SFX 1486 Y 1
SFX 1486 0 лници .
SFX 1139 Y 1
SFX 1139 0 ицата .
SFX 2575 Y 1
SFX 2575 0 шнине .
SFX 2076 Y 1
SFX 2076 0 штено .
SFX 4543 Y 1
SFX 4543 0 енете .
SFX 3432 Y 1
SFX 3432 0 шаните .
SFX 3730 Y 1
SFX 3730 0 личка .
SFX 512 Y 1
SFX 512 0 инка .
SFX 1640 Y 1
SFX 1640 0 инки .
SFX 4086 Y 1
SFX 4086 0 дри .
SFX 4472 Y 1
SFX 4472 0 вуваме .
SFX 1804 Y 1
SFX 1804 0 зија .
SFX 3127 Y 1
SFX 3127 0 иниот .
SFX 2717 Y 1
SFX 2717 0 елува .
SFX 4414 Y 1
SFX 4414 0 изирала .
SFX 4770 Y 1
SFX 4770 0 изирале .
SFX 4413 Y 1
SFX 4413 0 изирало .
SFX 3865 Y 1
SFX 3865 0 тувањана .
SFX 497 Y 1
SFX 497 0 вци .
SFX 3714 Y 1
SFX 3714 0 шуваш .
SFX 439 Y 1
SFX 439 0 ењана .
SFX 3713 Y 1
SFX 3713 0 шувај .
SFX 769 Y 1
SFX 769 0 вањево .
SFX 3964 Y 1
SFX 3964 0 орска .
SFX 1461 Y 1
SFX 1461 0 орски .
SFX 2754 Y 1
SFX 2754 0 жна .
SFX 1994 Y 1
SFX 1994 0 жни .
SFX 2248 Y 1
SFX 2248 0 жно .
SFX 303 Y 1
SFX 303 0 чката .
SFX 2837 Y 1
SFX 2837 0 нтите .
SFX 3800 Y 1
SFX 3800 0 едов .
SFX 1656 Y 1
SFX 1656 0 рското .
SFX 892 Y 1
SFX 892 0 рче .
SFX 3824 Y 1
SFX 3824 0 рчи .
SFX 998 Y 1
SFX 998 0 ции .
SFX 843 Y 1
SFX 843 0 мина .
SFX 2872 Y 1
SFX 2872 0 мине .
SFX 4710 Y 1
SFX 4710 0 оносниот .
SFX 3104 Y 1
SFX 3104 0 тноно .
SFX 4080 Y 1
SFX 4080 0 мар .
SFX 1329 Y 1
SFX 1329 0 мат .
SFX 1168 Y 1
SFX 1168 0 арска .
SFX 510 Y 1
SFX 510 0 арски .
SFX 2411 Y 1
SFX 2411 0 арско .
SFX 1669 Y 1
SFX 1669 0 авица .
SFX 2554 Y 1
SFX 2554 0 тенана .
SFX 4026 Y 1
SFX 4026 0 пнаа .
SFX 4279 Y 1
SFX 4279 0 пнав .
SFX 3775 Y 1
SFX 3775 0 пнал .
SFX 3577 Y 1
SFX 3577 0 лиот .
SFX 2694 Y 1
SFX 2694 0 ивност .
SFX 3175 Y 1
SFX 3175 0 фов .
SFX 3600 Y 1
SFX 3600 0 фон .
SFX 4378 Y 1
SFX 4378 0 ничарски .
SFX 2955 Y 1
SFX 2955 0 тизам .
SFX 2658 Y 1
SFX 2658 0 ствениот .
SFX 2766 Y 1
SFX 2766 0 чувањава .
SFX 3660 Y 1
SFX 3660 0 ажување .
SFX 2946 Y 1
SFX 2946 0 вената .
SFX 1876 Y 1
SFX 1876 0 ченана .
SFX 2444 Y 1
SFX 2444 0 нуваното .
SFX 2921 Y 1
SFX 2921 0 дувајќи .
SFX 4915 Y 1
SFX 4915 0 ичник .
SFX 4676 Y 1
SFX 4676 0 изирањана .
SFX 4144 Y 1
SFX 4144 0 арсково .
SFX 4595 Y 1
SFX 4595 0 неат .
SFX 2835 Y 1
SFX 2835 0 ограф .
SFX 4106 Y 1
SFX 4106 0 ализирање .
SFX 4116 Y 1
SFX 4116 0 жувањава .
SFX 3893 Y 1
SFX 3893 0 алување .
SFX 753 Y 1
SFX 753 0 ишта .
SFX 337 Y 1
SFX 337 0 иште .
SFX 3344 Y 1
SFX 3344 0 ерам .
SFX 2877 Y 1
SFX 2877 0 имов .
SFX 1425 Y 1
SFX 1425 0 ту .
SFX 4169 Y 1
SFX 4169 0 тирани .
SFX 4489 Y 1
SFX 4489 0 џилак .
SFX 2093 Y 1
SFX 2093 0 чиме .
SFX 4184 Y 1
SFX 4184 0 мената .
SFX 1244 Y 1
SFX 1244 0 реа .
SFX 515 Y 1
SFX 515 0 рев .
SFX 4350 Y 1
SFX 4350 0 рее .
SFX 1123 Y 1
SFX 1123 0 рел .
SFX 459 Y 1
SFX 459 0 рен .
SFX 4926 Y 1
SFX 4926 0 едени .
SFX 3582 Y 1
SFX 3582 0 енот .
SFX 202 Y 1
SFX 202 0 енине .
SFX 3409 Y 1
SFX 3409 0 анскиов .
SFX 3408 Y 1
SFX 3408 0 анскион .
SFX 3798 Y 1
SFX 3798 0 ееме .
SFX 4869 Y 1
SFX 4869 0 аголен .
SFX 897 Y 1
SFX 897 0 ираната .
SFX 1883 Y 1
SFX 1883 0 ливиов .
SFX 1882 Y 1
SFX 1882 0 ливион .
SFX 3658 Y 1
SFX 3658 0 ејување .
SFX 4905 Y 1
SFX 4905 0 нчено .
SFX 2074 Y 1
SFX 2074 0 ичарка .
SFX 1061 Y 1
SFX 1061 0 ваното .
SFX 4577 Y 1
SFX 4577 0 ради .
SFX 2538 Y 1
SFX 2538 0 чувавме .
SFX 1287 Y 1
SFX 1287 0 ота .
SFX 1259 Y 1
SFX 1259 0 оти .
SFX 38 Y 1
SFX 38 0 ото .
SFX 4887 Y 1
SFX 4887 0 тален .
SFX 915 Y 1
SFX 915 0 нала .
SFX 827 Y 1
SFX 827 0 нале .
SFX 968 Y 1
SFX 968 0 нало .
SFX 2913 Y 1
SFX 2913 0 рувањево .
SFX 3198 Y 1
SFX 3198 0 ометарот .
SFX 932 Y 1
SFX 932 0 натите .
SFX 2785 Y 1
SFX 2785 0 рувања .
SFX 983 Y 1
SFX 983 0 рување .
SFX 427 Y 1
SFX 427 0 ања .
SFX 181 Y 1
SFX 181 0 ање .
SFX 2824 Y 1
SFX 2824 0 чанка .
SFX 4975 Y 1
SFX 4975 0 ишаа .
SFX 4974 Y 1
SFX 4974 0 ишав .
SFX 4973 Y 1
SFX 4973 0 ишал .
SFX 4298 Y 1
SFX 4298 0 ишан .
SFX 3913 Y 1
SFX 3913 0 саниот .
SFX 779 Y 1
SFX 779 0 ичниот .
SFX 3124 Y 1
SFX 3124 0 низам .
SFX 3859 Y 1
SFX 3859 0 чуваниве .
SFX 3724 Y 1
SFX 3724 0 севме .
SFX 2068 Y 1
SFX 2068 0 тените .
SFX 218 Y 1
SFX 218 0 ар .
SFX 805 Y 1
SFX 805 0 ас .
SFX 13 Y 1
SFX 13 0 ат .
SFX 2909 Y 1
SFX 2909 0 ах .
SFX 1199 Y 1
SFX 1199 0 ац .
SFX 363 Y 1
SFX 363 0 ач .
SFX 312 Y 1
SFX 312 0 аш .
SFX 266 Y 1
SFX 266 0 ај .
SFX 4727 Y 1
SFX 4727 0 жуваниве .
SFX 3440 Y 1
SFX 3440 0 тскиов .
SFX 3439 Y 1
SFX 3439 0 тскион .
SFX 2718 Y 1
SFX 2718 0 дност .
SFX 2759 Y 1
SFX 2759 0 бил .
SFX 1823 Y 1
SFX 1823 0 чените .
SFX 3218 Y 1
SFX 3218 0 ичарска .
SFX 2267 Y 1
SFX 2267 0 ичарски .
SFX 3887 Y 1
SFX 3887 0 ичарско .
SFX 2993 Y 1
SFX 2993 0 кари .
SFX 398 Y 1
SFX 398 0 уваното .
SFX 4772 Y 1
SFX 4772 0 екувања .
SFX 2361 Y 1
SFX 2361 0 екување .
SFX 1694 Y 1
SFX 1694 0 изирана .
SFX 1507 Y 1
SFX 1507 0 изирани .
SFX 2539 Y 1
SFX 2539 0 изирано .
SFX 3792 Y 1
SFX 3792 0 зела .
SFX 3791 Y 1
SFX 3791 0 зеле .
SFX 3790 Y 1
SFX 3790 0 зело .
SFX 2012 Y 1
SFX 2012 0 итост .
SFX 3290 Y 1
SFX 3290 0 лиева .
SFX 3731 Y 1
SFX 3731 0 лиеви .
SFX 1246 Y 1
SFX 1246 0 ологија .
SFX 3210 Y 1
SFX 3210 0 овските .
SFX 3926 Y 1
SFX 3926 0 изираа .
SFX 4834 Y 1
SFX 4834 0 изирав .
SFX 4456 Y 1
SFX 4456 0 изирал .
SFX 4833 Y 1
SFX 4833 0 изирам .
SFX 1451 Y 1
SFX 1451 0 изиран .
SFX 1794 Y 1
SFX 1794 0 стот .
SFX 4969 Y 1
SFX 4969 0 лков .
SFX 3457 Y 1
SFX 3457 0 сенава .
SFX 4782 Y 1
SFX 4782 0 едувала .
SFX 4781 Y 1
SFX 4781 0 едувале .
SFX 1607 Y 1
SFX 1607 0 овец .
SFX 4786 Y 1
SFX 4786 0 вувавме .
SFX 1845 Y 1
SFX 1845 0 снаа .
SFX 1844 Y 1
SFX 1844 0 снав .
SFX 1843 Y 1
SFX 1843 0 снал .
SFX 3331 Y 1
SFX 3331 0 отат .
SFX 3765 Y 1
SFX 3765 0 цира .
SFX 3819 Y 1
SFX 3819 0 цка .
SFX 2994 Y 1
SFX 2994 0 ијев .
SFX 3215 Y 1
SFX 3215 0 ничкава .
SFX 1471 Y 1
SFX 1471 0 нца .
SFX 607 Y 1
SFX 607 0 нце .
SFX 667 Y 1
SFX 667 0 нци .
SFX 1782 Y 1
SFX 1782 0 рчиња .
SFX 3669 Y 1
SFX 3669 0 шаниве .
SFX 3375 Y 1
SFX 3375 0 дал .
SFX 1423 Y 1
SFX 1423 0 дам .
SFX 1504 Y 1
SFX 1504 0 дан .
SFX 1799 Y 1
SFX 1799 0 нира .
SFX 4532 Y 1
SFX 4532 0 ишани .
SFX 3183 Y 1
SFX 3183 0 киќ .
SFX 4978 Y 1
SFX 4978 0 исне .
SFX 4301 Y 1
SFX 4301 0 исни .
SFX 587 Y 1
SFX 587 0 раше .
SFX 2209 Y 1
SFX 2209 0 тност .
SFX 3202 Y 1
SFX 3202 0 телност .
SFX 736 Y 1
SFX 736 0 чува .
SFX 3305 Y 1
SFX 3305 0 егнеа .
SFX 3484 Y 1
SFX 3484 0 бување .
SFX 3304 Y 1
SFX 3304 0 егнев .
SFX 3303 Y 1
SFX 3303 0 егнел .
SFX 4120 Y 1
SFX 4120 0 рчињата .
SFX 4918 Y 1
SFX 4918 0 иција .
SFX 4061 Y 1
SFX 4061 0 авка .
SFX 1030 Y 1
SFX 1030 0 ваниот .
SFX 2377 Y 1
SFX 2377 0 довска .
SFX 2376 Y 1
SFX 2376 0 довски .
SFX 1391 Y 1
SFX 1391 0 чниов .
SFX 3479 Y 1
SFX 3479 0 жувања .
SFX 1390 Y 1
SFX 1390 0 чнион .
SFX 1248 Y 1
SFX 1248 0 жување .
SFX 489 Y 1
SFX 489 0 чкава .
SFX 2285 Y 1
SFX 2285 0 идниот .
SFX 358 Y 1
SFX 358 0 вите .
SFX 2276 Y 1
SFX 2276 0 рсково .
SFX 2512 Y 1
SFX 2512 0 уси .
SFX 4185 Y 1
SFX 4185 0 лувања .
SFX 1203 Y 1
SFX 1203 0 лување .
SFX 2050 Y 1
SFX 2050 0 зна .
SFX 4382 Y 1
SFX 4382 0 лувањето .
SFX 1687 Y 1
SFX 1687 0 зни .
SFX 2247 Y 1
SFX 2247 0 зно .
