utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.dic
чер/3,8,35,70,93,234,562,608,961,1316,1652,1813,2036,2054,2176,2230,2523,2628,2641,2642,3828,3834,4085
таб/6,9,31,32,33,34,89,93,116,152,172,223,372,460,509,523,629,673,706,728,739,906,957,989,1036,1046,1071,1137,1211,1229,1250,1265,1461,1523,1558,1816,1952,1999,2136,2186,2224,2298,2335,2405,2438,2713,2739,3730,4060,4296,4598
изр/609,1091,1384,1498,1501,1503,1654,1738,1747,1786,1813,1814,1836,1910,1911,1912,1917,1929,1933,1988,2011,2029,2030,2036,2048,2232,2251,2270,2441,2495,2496,2497,2498,2748,2749,2825,3330,3570,3604,3795,3966,4231,4285,4289,4312,4319,4466,4467,4620,4959,4961,4990
смук/106,158,159,162,181,195,234,245,266,281,306,307,312,334,346,354,356,418,424,427,455,474,475,479,483,484,990,2042,2101
прис/107,172,311,588,710,798,907,930,970,1086,1090,1091,1106,1110,1129,1134,1147,1362,1384,1403,1503,1654,1668,1806,1810,1816,1953,2047,2105,2134,2173,2269,2408,2494,2666,2748,2802,3049,3133,3404,3658,3827,3998,4074,4139,4302,4580,4584,4608,4621,4830,4980,4987,4997
живи/1414,3064
диви/1804,4084
коко/194,502,772,1300,1309,1588,2291,2470,2719,4023
мост/2,3,6,7,14,20,81,87,113,140,141,218,232,314,315,318,429,672,676,700,766,1419,1695,1867,2298
блед/2,3,9,21,23,24,26,28,30,34,36,38,42,43,44,45,69,70,300,1574,2246,2838,2987,3190,3295,3826,3868,3968,4179,4595,4907,4908,4909,4965,4966
есен/3,4,5,10,24,29,70,138,144,149,157,164,186,194,224,244,246,247,248,249,250,252,253,623,747,998,1112,4286
целе/3730
дола/464,845,1215,1314,1854,1927,1993,2175,2339,2520,2521,2638,2645,2650,2744,2752,3018,3170,3790,3791,3792,3835,3975,3976,4041,4089
мете/509,629,1250,1461,1547
истр/541,562,739,905,924,1611,1675,1929,1952,2115,2156,2159,2330,2341,2430,2712,2717,2746,2756,2768,2950,3051,3328,3612,3619,3655,3775,3835,4016,4024,4025,4026,4054,4075,4089,4141,4225,4278,4279,4286,4312,4900,4981,4982
дека/761,1025,1142,1330,1360,1472,1587,1897,2015,2080,2266,2404,2440,2600,2733,2735,2880,2881,3000,3134,3135,3137,3138,3139,3140,3141,3142,4929
неби/81,88,154,164,630,757,1233,1458,1711,1893,2129,2209,2346,2998,3104,3105,3106,3107,3108,3109,3110,3111,3136,4341
штава/1370
ампер/1622,2266,2404
кирил/186,1015,1047,1139,1230,1542,1642
сплет/3,6,7,13,14,50,70,80,81,83,94,101,102,111,143,161,169,173,178,192,396,565,681,694,1093,1293,1380,1381,1428,2490,2873,2993,3733,4195
видео/3600
чакар/486,874,1343
наско/50,96,396,694,759
писар/512,556
истра/7,29,70,80,102,106,143,152,163,165,171,174,175,203,357,414,430,457,525,541,562,667,774,1291,1316,2159,2628,3612,3805,3835,4055,4089
повит/83,153,167,192,327,329,360,367,478,496,695,783,888,936,1018,1019,1097,1120,1121,1126,1305,1387,1543,2378,2379,2380,2381,2382,2383,2384,2385
потив/83,153,167,192,327,329,360,367,478,496,783,936,1120,1121,1126
остаре/13,54,61,80,102,116,162,457,1135
порекн/2,3,7,13,30,80,94,101,102,106,111,143,152,159,161,162,163,165,171,174,175,195,199,216,217,219,220,225,226,227,228,229,230,231,234,235,237,238,239,242,243,245,261,267,268,281,282,283,306,307,414,430,620,1342,1532,1666,1667,1962,2016,2135,2218,2219,2220,2221,2222,2223
поврат/3,5,6,8,13,21,35,47,51,52,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,70,80,93,94,102,106,142,143,152,161,163,165,166,169,170,171,173,174,175,178,184,188,196,197,200,201,202,204,207,208,210,211,212,214,215,269,300,311,338,389,410,428,478,614,637,767,990,3843
наклон/3,6,13,21,69,80,91,93,94,101,102,106,111,143,152,161,163,165,171,174,175,197,199,214,215,216,217,219,220,225,226,227,228,229,230,231,235,237,238,239,242,243,261,267,268,269,282,283,300,311,338,340,389,410,467,569,588,955,1140,1415,1517,1548,1549,1665,1832,1833,1948,1949,1950,1951
самово/305,395,419,481,523,524,909,923,1050,1368,1370,1486,1573,3125
поверен/148,182,198,262,284,304,359,840,1356,1914
прескок/2,15,35,51,112,158,191,233,241,251,258,259,289,295,297,322,650,665,666,684,685,740,742,743,761,788,799,801,802,810,819,820,821,823,824,827,839,848,849,850,857,858,861,862,866,895,896,910,915,919,920,932,968,987,1023,1027,1041,1052,1059,1075,1076,1077,1078,1079,1080,1100,1138
камбана/4,628,1754,2045,3022,4175
адвокату/429,477,759,1104,1118,2026
